New Jersey, session 221, A3408.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. a.  The Commissioner of Environmental Protection shall designate in, and include the designation in the master plan and management plan for, each State park and forest at least one area of the State park or forest in which a bat house shall be constructed and maintained.  The commissioner shall consult with experts on bats, nonprofit organizations and other entities knowledgeable about bats, and any other appropriate persons or entities to ensure the proper location, construction, and maintenance of each bat house, with minimal threat from fire, danger to the public, or impact on the publics use and enjoyment of the State park or forest. b.  The Division of Parks and Forestry in the Department of Environmental Protection shall post signs, as appropriate, notifying the public of the perimeters of each designated bat house area and its purpose, and take any other cautionary measures necessary to avoid destruction of the bat house and injurious interactions between bats and the public in and around each bat house. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.